nb: Flipperspillutgave: Jubileumsutgave; Arkadeutgave; Samlerutgave; Begrenset utgave; Premium; Pro; Remastret; Spesialutgave; Standard; Trollmannsutgave; Annet
es: Edición de máquina de pinball: Edición de aniversario; Edición arcade; Edición de coleccionista; Edición limitada; Prémium; Pro; Remasterizada; Edición especial; Estándar; Edición mago; Otros
lt-LT: Fliperio mašinos versija: Jubiliejinis leidimas; Arkadinis leidimas; Kolekcionierių leidimas; Ribotas leidimas; „Premium“; „Pro“; Perleistas; Specialus leidimas; Standartinis; Burtininko leidimas; Kita
th: รุ่นเครื่องพินบอล: ฉบับครบรอบ; ฉบับอาร์เคด; ฉบับสะสม; ฉบับจำกัด; พรีเมียม; โปร; รีมาสเตอร์; ฉบับพิเศษ; มาตรฐาน; ฉบับวิซาร์ด; อื่นๆ
en: Pinball machine edition: Anniversary Edition; Arcade Edition; Collector's Edition; Limited Edition; Premium; Pro; Remastered; Special Edition; Standard; Wizard Edition; Other
hu: Flippergépkiadás: Évfordulós kiadás; Játéktermi kiadás; Gyűjtői kiadás; Limitált kiadás; Prémium; Professzionális; Felújított; Különleges kiadás; Normál; Varázsló kiadás; Egyéb
de: Flipperautomaten-Edition: Jubiläumsausgabe; Arcade-Ausgabe; Sammlerausgabe; Limitierte Ausgabe; Premium; Professionell; Remastered; Sonderausgabe; Standard; Zauberer-Ausgabe; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Версия на машината за флипер: Юбилейно издание; Аркадно издание; Колекционерско издание; Лимитирано издание; Премиум; Про; Ремастерирано; Специално издание; Стандартно; Издание магьосник; Други
pt-BR: Edição da máquina de pinball: Edição de aniversário; Edição arcade; Edição de colecionador; Edição limitada; Premium; Pro; Remasterizada; Edição especial; Padrão; Edição wizard; Outro
fr: Édition du flipper: Édition anniversaire; Édition arcade; Édition collector; Édition limitée; Premium; Pro; Remasterisé; Édition spéciale; Standard; Édition wizard; Autre
zh-CN: 弹球机版本: 周年纪念版; 街机版; 收藏版; 限量版; 优质; 专业; 重制版; 特别版; 标准; 巫师版; 其他
ja: ピンボールマシンエディション: アニバーサリーエディション; アーケードエディション; コレクターズエディション; リミテッドエディション; プレミアム; プロ; リマスター; スペシャルエディション; スタンダード; ウィザードエディション; その他
sk-SK: Edícia pinballového automatu: Výročná edícia; Arkádová edícia; Zberateľská edícia; Limitovaná edícia; Prémiový; Pro; Remasterovaná; Špeciálna edícia; Štandardný; Čarodejnícka edícia; Iné
cs: Edice pinballového automatu: Výroční edice; Arkádová edice; Sběratelská edice; Limitovaná edice; Premium; Pro; Remasterovaná; Speciální edice; Standardní; Kouzelnická edice; Jiné
da: Flippermaskineudgave: Jubilæumsudgave; Arkadeudgave; Samlerudgave; Begrænset udgave; Premium; Pro; Remastered; Specialudgave; Standard; Wizard-udgave; Andet
zh-TW: 彈珠台版本: 週年紀念版; 街機版; 收藏版; 限量版; 高級; 專業版; 重製版; 特別版; 標準; 巫師版; 其他
hr-HR: Edicija flipera: Jubilarno izdanje; Arkadno izdanje; Kolekcionarsko izdanje; Ograničeno izdanje; Vrhunska; Profesionalni; Remasterirano; Specijalno izdanje; Standardni; Čarobnjakovo izdanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Ediția aparatului de pinball: Ediție aniversară; Ediție arcade; Ediție de colecție; Ediție limitată; Premium; Pro; Remasterizat; Ediție specială; Standard; Ediție vrăjitor; Altele
vi: Phiên bản máy pinball: Phiên bản kỷ niệm; Phiên bản arcade; Phiên bản sưu tầm; Phiên bản giới hạn; Cao cấp; Chuyên nghiệp; Làm lại; Phiên bản đặc biệt; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Phiên bản phù thủy; Khác
fi: Flipperikoneen versio: Juhlaversio; Arcade-versio; Keräilijäversio; Rajoitettu erä; Premium; Pro; Remasteroitu; Erikoisversio; Tavallinen; Velhoversio; Muu
el: Έκδοση μηχανής φλίπερ: Επετειακή έκδοση; Έκδοση arcade; Έκδοση συλλέκτη; Περιορισμένη έκδοση; Ανώτερης ποιότητας; Pro; Ψηφιακά ανανεωμένη; Ειδική έκδοση; Κανονικό; Έκδοση μάγου; Άλλο
sv: Flipperspelsutgåva: Jubileumsutgåva; Arkadutgåva; Samlaredition; Begränsad utgåva; Premium; Pro; Remastrad; Specialutgåva; Standard; Trollkarlsutgåva; Övrigt
ru: Версия пинбольного автомата: Юбилейное издание; Аркадное издание; Коллекционное издание; Ограниченное издание; Премиум; Профессиональный; Ремастеринг; Специальное издание; Стандартный; Издание мастера; Другой
pt-PT: Edição da máquina de pinball: Edição aniversário; Edição arcade; Edição de colecionador; Edição limitada; Premium; Pro; Remasterizada; Edição especial; Padrão; Edição wizard; Outro
it: Edizione della macchina flipper: Edizione anniversario; Edizione arcade; Edizione del collezionista; Edizione limitata; Premium; Pro; Rimasterizzata; Edizione speciale; Standard; Edizione wizard; Altro
ko: 핀볼 머신 에디션: 기념 에디션; 아케이드 에디션; 컬렉터스 에디션; 리미티드 에디션; 프리미엄; 프로; 리마스터드; 스페셜 에디션; 표준; 위저드 에디션; 기타
pl: Edycja automatu do pinballa: Edycja rocznicowa; Edycja arkadowa; Edycja kolekcjonerska; Edycja limitowana; Premium; Profesjonalny; Zremasterowana; Edycja specjalna; Standard; Edycja czarodzieja; Inne
sl-SI: Izdaja fliperja: Obletniška izdaja; Arkadna izdaja; Zbirateljska izdaja; Omejena izdaja; Premium; Profesionalna; Remasterirana; Posebna izdaja; Standarden; Čarovnikova izdaja; Drugo
nl: Flipperkast editie: Anniversary Edition; Arcade Edition; Collector's Edition; Limited Edition; Premium; Pro; Remastered; Special Edition; Standaard; Wizard Edition; Andere
tr: Langırt makinesi sürümü: Yıldönümü sürümü; Atari salonu sürümü; Koleksiyoncu sürümü; Sınırlı sürüm; Premium; Pro; Yeniden düzenlenmiş; Özel sürüm; Standart; Büyücü sürümü; Diğer